Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-743
Violations;
administrative fine; costs; lien.

(1) The director may, following
a hearing under the Administrative Procedure Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under
the act, impose an administrative fine against any officer, director,
shareholder, partner, or member of a licensee, if the director finds the licensee
or any such person participated in or had knowledge of any act prohibited
by sections 45-737,
45-740, and 45-742 or otherwise violated the Residential Mortgage Licensing
Act. Such administrative fine shall be in addition to or separate from any
fine imposed against a licensee pursuant to section 45-742.

(2) If the director finds, after notice and hearing in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act and
the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act,
that any person has knowingly committed any act prohibited by section 45-742 or otherwise violated the Residential Mortgage Licensing
Act, the director may order such person to pay (a) an administrative fine
of not more than five thousand dollars for each separate violation and (b)
the costs of investigation.

(3) If a person fails to pay an administrative fine and the costs of
investigation ordered pursuant to this section, a lien in the amount of such
fine and costs may be imposed upon all assets and property of such person
in this state and may be recovered in a civil action by the director. The
lien shall attach to the real property of such person when notice of the lien
is filed and indexed against the real property in the office of the register
of deeds in the county where the real property is located. The lien shall
attach to any other property of such person when notice of the lien is filed
against the property in the manner prescribed by law. Failure of the person
to pay such fine and costs shall constitute a separate violation of the act.

Laws 1995, LB 163, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 218, § 12;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 34;

R.S.Supp.,2008, § 45-717.01;

Laws 2009, LB328, § 28.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.